Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2042
Temporary educational or visiting faculty permit; duration; renewal.

The duration of any temporary educational or visiting faculty permit shall be determined by the department but in no case shall it be in excess of one year. The permit may be renewed annually as long as the holder of a temporary educational permit is still enrolled and participating in the program of supervised educational training or as long as the holder of a visiting faculty permit is still teaching students of medicine or conducting research.

Laws 1969, c. 560, § 12, p. 2284;

Laws 1971, LB 150, § 9;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 429;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,107.06;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 335;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 700.